Hawaii statutes.
[§353G-7] Conditions of parole or other
release from a correctional center or facility. (a) If an inmate ordered
pursuant to this chapter to participate in a treatment program is granted
parole or other release from a correctional center or facility, the inmate
shall agree as a condition of parole or other release to the following terms:

(1) Submit to subsequent unannounced, random,
periodic drug tests to be performed by the agency responsible for monitoring
the inmate's compliance with the terms and conditions of parole or other
release from a correctional center or facility;

(2) Undergo an assessment as required by section 353G-4
and cooperate fully with the assessment program;

(3) Participate in a treatment program and cooperate
fully with the treatment program;

(4) Fulfill satisfactorily any other terms and
conditions ordered by the agency responsible for monitoring the inmate's
compliance with the terms and conditions of parole or other release from a
correctional center or facility, including but not limited to:

(A) Periodic telephone contact or office
visits to a designated person or agency;

(B) Periodic unannounced visits by a
designated person or agency to the inmate's home or place of commitment;

(C) Curfew or restricted travel and associations;
and

(D) Electronic monitoring[;]

(5) Cooperate fully with the agency responsible for
monitoring the inmate's compliance with the terms and conditions of parole or
other release from a correctional center or facility; and

(6) Pay drug testing and assessment fees in
accordance with section 353G-10.

(b) The inmate shall acknowledge, as a
condition of parole or other release from a correctional center or facility,
that failure to comply with the terms set forth in subsection (a) may result in
the modification of the conditions of parole or other release by the agency
responsible for monitoring the inmate's compliance.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall preclude a
person from petitioning the agency responsible for monitoring the person's
compliance with the terms and conditions of parole or other release from a
correctional center or facility to modify the terms and conditions of the
person's parole or other release. [L 1998, c 152, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next